Arkansas, session 2025, HB1744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 2-19-202(a)(1), concerning the registration
of fertilizer and fertilizer materials, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) All manufacturers, jobbers, and manipulators of commercial
fertilizers and of fertilizer materials to be used in the manufacture of
fertilizer, who may desire to sell or offer for sale in Arkansas fertilizer
and fertilizer materials, shall first file for registration with the State
Plant Board Department of Agriculture, upon forms furnished by the Department
of Agriculture department.
(B) The forms shall include the name of the brand of each
fertilizer, fertilizer materials, or chemicals which they may desire to sell
in the state, either by themselves or their agents, together with the names
and addresses of the manufacturers or manipulators, and such other
information as may be required by the board State Plant Board in its rules.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 2-19-202(d)(1)(B)(i), concerning the
registration of special agricultural crop-use fertilizer, is amended to read
as follows:
(B)(i) The special agricultural crop-use fertilizers with
*CRH154*
03/10/2025 4:45:23 PM CRH154

HB1744
less than the twenty-unit minimum shall be permitted for sale only after the
fertilizer grade is registered with the board department.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 2-19-203(a), concerning the sale of
unregistered fertilizers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer, individual,
corporation, or company, either by themselves or agents, to sell or offer for
sale in this state any fertilizer brand or fertilizer materials that have not
been registered with and the registration approved by the State Plant Board
Department of Agriculture or its authorized representative, as required by
this subchapter.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 2-19-206(c)(1), concerning the
determination of the market value of the materials used in the manufacture of
fertilizer and fertilizer material, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The department board shall ascertain the market value of the
materials from the manufacturers of fertilizer and fertilizer materials
specified in this subchapter to be used in the manufacture of fertilizer and
fertilizer materials and from other reliable sources. This determination
shall be done to fix units of value on them to be used in determining the
amount of damages due when the official analysis shows a deficiency from the
guaranteed analysis as specified in this subchapter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 2-19-207 is amended to read as follows:
2-19-207. Sampling fertilizers.
The inspectors for the Department of Agriculture shall obtain samples
of fertilizer or fertilizer materials in the following manner:
(1) They shall draw samples with a core instrument that shall
not be less than twelve inches (12″) in length in a manner that will procure a
representative sample from such shipments of fertilizer or fertilizer
materials as they may be directed by the State Plant Board department or that
they may find uninspected;
(2) Where there are ten (10) packages or less, they shall take
samples from every package; where there are ten (10) or more packages, they
shall take samples from ten (10) packages, plus a sample for each additional
ton. In no case do more than twenty (20) packages need to be sampled;
03/10/2025 4:45:23 PM CRH154

HB1744
(3) After thoroughly mixing the samples so drawn, they shall
fill a container to be approved by the board department with a portion of the
mixed sample for chemical analysis or inspection; and
(4) Accompanying these samples, a report shall be made giving
the name of the commodity inspected, number of packages represented by
sample, the name of the manufacturer, the guaranteed analysis, the place
where inspected, the date of inspection, and the name of the inspector.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 2-19-208(a)(1), concerning the delivery of
samples of fertilizer for analysis, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Samples of fertilizer or fertilizer materials obtained by the
inspectors shall be delivered to the Department of Agriculture which shall
deliver the samples to the chief department chemist who shall make or cause
to be made a complete analysis thereof.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 2-19-209(a)(2), concerning the amount
required to be paid per ton or fractional ton accompanying a tonnage report,
is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A)(i) The report shall be accompanied with the sum Upon
receipt of the report, the department shall invoice the responsible party for
payment of the sum of two dollars and forty cents ($2.40) per ton or
fractional ton.
(ii) A fee The sum of two dollars and forty cents
($2.40) will accompany shall be paid for each monthly report of tonnage which
amounts to less than one (1) ton.
(B) The department shall issue receipt for the amount
received and shall deposit the sums received as follows:
(i) Sixty-two cents (62¢) of the two-dollar-and-
forty-cent fee sum per ton or fractional ton inspected shall be deposited
with the Treasurer of State as special revenues and shall be credited to the
Plant Board Fund to be used for the maintenance, operation, support, and
improvement of the State Plant Board programs; and
(ii)(a)(1) One dollar and seventy-eight cents
($1.78) of the two-dollar-and-forty-cent fee sum per ton or fractional ton
inspected shall be:
(A) Remitted to the Board of
03/10/2025 4:45:23 PM CRH154

HB1744
Trustees of the University of Arkansas; and
(B) Credited to a fund to be known
as the “University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and
Research Fund” to be maintained in accounts in one (1) or more financial
institutions in the State of Arkansas.
(2) Funds shall be expended:
(A) Exclusively for soil testing
service and soil fertility research by the Board of Trustees of the
University of Arkansas under appropriations made by the General Assembly; and
(B) In support of one (1) or more
soil testing laboratories at the Division of Agriculture of the University of
Arkansas's research and extension centers and research stations as determined
and designated by the Vice President for Agriculture of the University of
Arkansas, and soil fertility activities within the State of Arkansas.
(b)(1) The Board of Trustees of the University
of Arkansas shall provide for the investment of any funds in the University
of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund that are
not needed for current operations of the soil testing laboratories and soil
fertility service and research activities and shall credit the interest
earned on that investment to the credit of the University of Arkansas,
Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund.
(2) The investment shall be of the type
and nature authorized for the investment of average daily State Treasury
balances by the State Board of Finance.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 2-19-209(b)(3), concerning the penalty for
a late report or failure to report the entire amount of fertilizer sold, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) For a late report or for failure to report the entire amount
sold, the sum owed for tonnage fee on the late reported or unreported amount
shall be enhanced by ten percent (10%) if less than fifteen (15) days late,
twenty percent (20%) if less than thirty-one (31) days late, and doubled if
more than thirty (30) days late. Penalties shall be deposited into the Plant
Board Fund; otherwise, registrations may be cancelled by the State Plant
Board.

03/10/2025 4:45:23 PM CRH154

HB1744
SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 2-19-211 is amended to read as follows:
2-19-211. Use of penalties from sums owed for fertilizer tonnage fees.
All penalties received by the Department of Agriculture for failure to
pay or report sums owed for fertilizer tonnage fees shall be remitted to the
Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas, to be credited to the
University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research
Fund in the same manner as prescribed by § 2-19-209 and to be used for the
same purposes as described in § 2-19-209.




























03/10/2025 4:45:23 PM CRH154